Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Chapter 34. Apportionment of State Representatives

§ 1891.
Statement of policy.

The order of the U.S. District Court for the district of Vermont entered August 3, 1964, modified and affirmed by the Supreme Court of the United States, January 12, 1965 (
Parsons v. Buckley,
85 S.Ct. 503, 379 U.S. 359, 13 L.Ed.2d 352) requires that both houses of the General Assembly of Vermont be apportioned and districted on a basis other than the manner provided for in the Constitution of this State. Such order further provides that if reapportionment legislation is not enacted by July 1, 1965, the district court shall reapportion the General Assembly so as to comply with the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment to the U.S. Constitution.
In the light of this order, the General Assembly of Vermont declares that apportioning and districting is primarily a responsibility of the Legislature at this time to be accomplished by this chapter, and in such a manner as to achieve substantial equality in the choice of members of the General Assembly as guaranteed by the Constitution of the United States of America.
It is further declared to be the policy of the State of Vermont that the constitutional basis of apportionment of the House of Representatives can best be measured in this State by population.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 98

, § 2; amended

1981, No. 30

, § 1, eff. April 16, 1981.

§ 1891a.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter and in chapter 34A of this title:

“Initial district” or “district” means a district created by law in the final plan enacted pursuant to section 1906 of this title and listed in section 1893 of this title.

“Representative district” means a district from which one or two Representatives are elected.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 187

, § 3; amended

1973, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. date, see note set out below;

1981, No. 30

, § 6, eff. April 16, 1981, and shall apply to the 1981-82 reapportionment;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1991, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 13, 1992.

§ 1892.
House of Representatives membership.

The House of Representatives shall consist of 150 members, each of whom shall be elected from a district established by law.
No person shall be elected a Representative until he or she has resided in this State two years, the last of which shall be in the district for which he or she is elected.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 98

, § 3.

§ 1893.
Repealed. 2021, No. 89 (Adj. Sess.), § 1(a).

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 98

, § 4; amended

1973, No. 210

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. April 3, 1974;

1981, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 3, 1982, see note set out below;

1991, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 13, 1992;

1991, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 25, 1992;

2001, No. 85

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 3, 2002;

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 55-57, eff. June 27, 2002;

2011, No. 74

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 28, 2012;

2011, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 1, 2012; repealed by

2021, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a), effective April 6, 2022.

§ 1893a.
Repealed. 2021, No. 89 (Adj. Sess.), § 1(b).

HISTORY:

Added

2001, No. 151

(Adj. Sess.), § 53, eff. June 27, 2002; amended

2011, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 1, 2012; repealed by

2021, No. 89

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(b), effective April 6, 2022.